trunk/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
<pardef n="t/ăia__vblex">
     <e>
        <p>
          <l>ăia</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ai</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ai</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>aie</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiem</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiați</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>aie</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiam</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiai</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăia</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiam</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiați</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiau</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiasem</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiaseși</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiase</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiasem</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiaseți</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiaseră</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ai</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ai</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>aie</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiem</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiați</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>aie</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiat</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ăiat</l>
	  <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>    
       <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiată</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiați</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiate</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăindu</l>
	  <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ăind</l>
	  <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>     
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăind</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>aie</l>
	  <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>aie</l>
	  <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>aie</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>aie</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiem</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiați</l>
	  <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăiați</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>aie</l>
          <r>ăia<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    </pardef>

<e lm="tăia">
        <i>t</i>
        <par n="t/ăia__vblex"/>
      </e>
   <e lm="tăia beregata" a="mioara">
        <i>t</i>
        <par n="t/ăia__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>beregata</l>
	  <r><g><b/>beregata</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
